Colorado, session 2026A, HB1429.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Access to public benefits is fundamental to the health, stability,
and economic security of Colorado residents; the systems used to administer
those benefits must be accessible, efficient, and reliable;
(b) Modern, integrated technology systems are necessary to support
efficient program administration, improve client experience, and ensure
timely and effective delivery of benefits and services;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) The state's current benefits technology infrastructure is
fragmented, difficult to navigate, and imposes administrative burdens on
applicants, recipients, and staff who determine applicant eligibility, which
may limit access to services for eligible individuals and families;
(d) Colorado has the opportunity to redesign its benefits
infrastructure through modular technology built on published, open
standards—preserving state control of technology direction; ensuring
ongoing development of a comprehensive, long-term plan to redesign the
state's public benefits system to support cost mitigation; and increasing
administrative efficiency and the delivery of high-quality services for
individuals and families; and
(e) To ensure effective change management and minimize disruption
to services for individuals and families, the approach to redesigning the
safety net must occur within established timelines and include structured
planning processes, intentional stakeholder engagement, and regular
progress updates to the general assembly.
(2) The general assembly further declares that:
(a) The department of human services, the department of early
childhood, and the department of health care policy and financing, in
partnership with counties, front line workers, and other interested
stakeholders, shall conduct a structured, facilitated process to ensure that
Colorado operates a redesigned public benefits delivery model consisting
of no more than twelve cohorts of counties working together to administer
public assistance programs no later than July 1, 2028;
(b) The public benefits delivery system redesign:
(I) Replaces existing benefits technology with modular solutions
built on published, open standards to ensure adaptability, preserve state
control of technology direction, and enable continuous improvement in
service delivery;
(II) Ensures state-directed product management so the state retains
authority over strategy, roadmap, and measurement of user outcomes and
experience;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(III) Streamlines access through unified systems that are integrated
across programs to improve coordination and reduce administrative burden
on residents, applicants, and eligibility technicians;
(IV) Designs eligibility, enrollment, and redetermination processes
around the whole person using plain language and simple processes so that
seeking help is straightforward, dignified, and accessible regardless of
language or ability; and
(V) Adopts published, open standards and interoperability
requirements to ensure ongoing vendor competition and competitive
reprocurement that drives the best outcomes for residents; and
(c) The redesign of the state's benefits technology infrastructure is
a priority necessary to support improved program administration and
resident service delivery. State agencies responsible for benefits
administration should coordinate across programs, prioritize
implementation of redesign efforts, and report annually to the general
assembly, including working demonstrations of deployed service
improvements and measurable outcomes for residents.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-1-210 as
follows:
25.5-1-210. Centralized member integrity service - transition
plan - member integrity service fund.
(1) THE STATE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY
CHILDHOOD, SHALL CONTRACT WITH A SINGLE COUNTY DEPARTMENT TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE. PURSUANT TO
THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT, THE COUNTY ADMINISTERING THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE MAY SUBCONTRACT WITH OTHER
COUNTIES TO FULFILL ITS OBLIGATIONS. THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE MUST BE OPERATIONAL AND UTILIZED ON JULY 1, 2027.
(2) THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE IS RESPONSIBLE
FOR CONDUCTING FRAUD INVESTIGATIONS FOR FRAUD CLAIMS, FRAUD
RECOVERY, FRAUD DISPUTE RESOLUTION CONFERENCES, AND STATE-LEVEL
FRAUD HEARINGS, INTENTIONAL PROGRAM VIOLATION WAIVERS, AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

CRIMINAL COURT PROCEEDINGS, CONCERNING PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY OR
FRAUD AFFECTING ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARDS OR SIMILAR
CREDIT-CARD-TYPE DEVICES THROUGH WHICH FOOD STAMP OR CASH
ASSISTANCE BENEFITS MAY BE DELIVERED.
(3) THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE MUST BE
UTILIZED FOR THE FOLLOWING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS:
(a) THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5;
(b) THE CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 8 OF TITLE 25.5;
(c) THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF TITLE 26;
(d) THE COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 26.5;
(e) THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES PROGRAM, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 26-2-703; AND
(f) ADULT FINANCIAL PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART
1 OF ARTICLE 2 OF TITLE 26, WHICH INCLUDES THE OLD AGE PENSION, AID TO
THE NEEDY DISABLED, AND HOME CARE ALLOWANCE.
(4) (a) BY JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL
COLLABORATE WITH THE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS TO CREATE A TRANSITION
PLAN THAT MUST BE USED TO TRANSITION COUNTIES TO THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE.
(b) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST OUTLINE THE PARAMETERS FOR
COUNTY DEPARTMENT FRAUD AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY FUNCTIONS,
INCLUDING FRAUD CLAIMS, FRAUD RECOVERY, FRAUD DISPUTE RESOLUTION
CONFERENCES, AND STATE-LEVEL FRAUD HEARINGS, RELATED TO THE
PROGRAMS DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST INCLUDE A PHASED TRANSITION
PROCESS, WHICH BEGINS JULY 1, 2027, AND CONCLUDES WITH ALL FRAUD
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY FUNCTIONS BEING CONDUCTED THROUGH THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE BY JULY 1, 2028.
(d) A COUNTY DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTINUE TO CONDUCT AND
COMPLETE FRAUD PROGRAM INTEGRITY FUNCTIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS UNTIL THE
COUNTY DEPARTMENT HAS TRANSITIONED TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TRANSITION PLAN. ALL
FRAUD AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY FUNCTIONS, INCLUDING OPEN
INVESTIGATIONS, UNWORKED REFERRALS, RECOVERIES, FRAUD DISPUTE
RESOLUTION CONFERENCES, STATE-LEVEL FRAUD HEARINGS, INTENTIONAL
PROGRAM VIOLATION WAIVERS, AND CRIMINAL COURT PROCEEDINGS, MUST
BE TRANSFERRED TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE BY
JULY 1, 2028.
(5) (a) THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND
IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF RECOUPED
MONEY BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT THAT RESULTS FROM MEMBER FRAUD
INVESTIGATIONS AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND. SUBJECT TO ANNUAL
APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, MONEY IN THE FUND MAY BE
USED FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE FUNCTIONS AS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
CONTRACTOR EXPENSES.
(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME
DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND TO THE FUND.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26-1-119.5 as
follows:
26-1-119.5. State and county departments - minimum
requirements - state supervision - corrective action protocols -
definitions - legislative declaration.
(1) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(I) COLORADO CURRENTLY OPERATES A STATE-SUPERVISED,
COUNTY-ADMINISTERED HUMAN SERVICES SYSTEM IN WHICH COUNTIES
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

DELIVER SERVICES DIRECTLY TO RESIDENTS;
(II) CONSISTENT STATEWIDE PERFORMANCE REQUIREMENTS,
INCLUDING OVERSIGHT AND PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PROCESSES, ARE
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES RECEIVE SERVICES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE LAW, FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS, AND PROGRAM
STANDARDS;
(III) PERFORMANCE REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING OVERSIGHT AND
CORRECTIVE ACTION PROCESSES, CURRENTLY VARY ACROSS PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, AND THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, RESULTING IN INCONSISTENCIES
IN ACCOUNTABILITY, TRANSPARENCY, AND SUPPORT; AND
(IV) ESTABLISHING A STANDARDIZED FRAMEWORK FOR
PERFORMANCE REQUIREMENTS, MONITORING, AND CORRECTIVE ACTION
THROUGH STREAMLINED CONTRACTS BETWEEN THE STATE AND COUNTIES
PROMOTES TRANSPARENCY, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND EFFECTIVE PARTNERSHIP
BETWEEN THE STATE AND COUNTIES TO DELIVER SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS
AND FAMILIES.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
A CONSISTENT CORRECTIVE ACTION FRAMEWORK MUST ENSURE:
(I) EARLY IDENTIFICATION OF PERFORMANCE CONCERNS;
(II) TIMELY TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND SUPPORT;
(III) CLEAR EXPECTATIONS FOR CORRECTIVE ACTIONS; AND
(IV) APPROPRIATE REMEDIAL MEASURES WHEN SYSTEMIC ISSUES
REMAIN UNRESOLVED.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADULT FINANCIAL PROGRAMS" MEANS A STATE-RUN BENEFIT
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES THAT INCLUDES
THE OLD AGE PENSION, AID TO THE NEEDY DISABLED, AND HOME CARE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

ALLOWANCE, AS DETAILED IN PART 1 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE 26.
(b) "CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN" MEANS A FORMAL PLAN FOR WHEN
A COUNTY DEPARTMENT FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF A
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT IN WHICH THE COUNTY IS A PARTY,
PERFORMANCE METRICS, OR APPLICABLE STATE OR FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION.
(c) "PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS" MEANS THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF TITLE
25.5; THE CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 8 OF TITLE 25.5; THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE
26; THE COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF THIS TITLE 26.5; THE TEMPORARY
ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26-2-703; THE OLD AGE PENSION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE XXIV OF THE COLORADO CONSTITUTION; AND ADULT FINANCIAL
PROGRAMS.
(d) "STATE DEPARTMENTS" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD.
(3) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS
SHALL COLLABORATE TO ESTABLISH ALIGNED MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR
COUNTY DEPARTMENTS THROUGH PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS,
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE SPECIFIC STATE AND FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS
APPLICABLE TO EACH PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. PRIOR TO FEBRUARY
1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL SHARE DRAFT TEMPLATES OF THE
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT WITH THE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS FOR
REVIEW AND COMMENT.
(4) (a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL
ENTER INTO A PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT WITH EACH COUNTY
DEPARTMENT FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE STATE AND COUNTY
DEPARTMENTS FOR ADMINISTERING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(II) ESTABLISHING CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS APPLICABLE TO
BOTH THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND COUNTY DEPARTMENTS; AND
(III) CONSOLIDATING EXISTING CONTRACTS, MEMORANDA OF
UNDERSTANDING, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS RELATED TO THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.
(b) EACH PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT MUST INCLUDE, AT A
MINIMUM:
(I) MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND
COUNTY DEPARTMENTS;
(II) MEASURABLE OUTCOMES AND PERFORMANCE METRICS;
(III) CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS AND CONSEQUENCES FOR A
COUNTY DEPARTMENT THAT FAILS TO MEET THE PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS;
(IV) FOR COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, REQUIREMENTS TO MEET
PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS IDENTIFIED IN THE PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACT, INCLUDING:
(A) THRESHOLDS FOR METRICS INCLUDED IN MANAGEMENT
EVALUATIONS;
(B) THRESHOLDS FOR METRICS INCLUDED IN QUALITY ASSURANCE
REVIEWS;
(C) TRACKING AND REPORTING DATA FOR CONTINUOUS QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT AND PUBLIC REPORTING;
(D) REQUIREMENTS CURRENTLY INCLUDED IN CONTRACTS,
MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE
STATE DEPARTMENTS AND COUNTY DEPARTMENTS;
(E) REQUIRED PARTICIPATION IN STATE-PROVIDED TRAINING AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE;
(F) COMPLYING WITH CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS; AND
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(G) THRESHOLDS FOR METRICS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL AGENCIES
OVERSEEING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; AND
(V) FOR THE STATE DEPARTMENTS, REQUIREMENTS TO MEET
PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS IDENTIFIED IN THE PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACT, INCLUDING:
(A) PROVIDING FUNDING, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND TRAINING TO
ENABLE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS TO PROCESS CASES AND SERVE RECIPIENTS;
(B) MAINTAINING PRIMARY ACCOUNTABILITY TO THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AND ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL LAW;
(C) REQUIREMENTS CURRENTLY INCLUDED IN CONTRACTS,
MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE
STATE DEPARTMENTS AND COUNTY DEPARTMENTS;
(D) REQUIREMENTS FOR CARRYING OUT MANAGEMENT
EVALUATIONS AND QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWS;
(E) REQUIREMENTS FOR LEADING STATEWIDE CONTINUOUS QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT PROCESSES IN CONSULTATION WITH COUNTY DEPARTMENTS;
AND
(F) REQUIREMENTS TO PUBLISH PUBLIC-FACING PERFORMANCE DATA
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 26-1-144.
(5) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS RETAIN ULTIMATE SUPERVISORY
AUTHORITY OVER EACH COUNTY DEPARTMENT AND SHALL MONITOR EACH
COUNTY DEPARTMENT'S COMPLIANCE WITH PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACTS, STATE LAW, AND FEDERAL LAW. MONITORING MUST INCLUDE,
AT A MINIMUM:
(I) DETERMINING THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT'S COMPLIANCE WITH
PROGRAM PERFORMANCE METRICS;
(II) QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWS;
(III) CASE OR REPORT REVIEWS;
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(IV) AUDIT FINDINGS; AND
(V) COMPLIANCE MONITORING REQUIRED BY STATE OR FEDERAL
LAW.
(b) MONITORING MUST OCCUR AT LEAST MONTHLY, OR MORE
FREQUENTLY WHEN PROGRAM PERFORMANCE METRICS PERMIT.
(c) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL NOTIFY A COUNTY DEPARTMENT
OF PERFORMANCE CONCERNS WHEN:
(I) A COUNTY DEPARTMENT'S PERFORMANCE FAILS TO MEET
REQUIREMENTS OUTLINED IN THE PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS OR THIS
SECTION 26-1-119.5 FOR THREE CONSECUTIVE MONTHS; OR
(II) MONITORING SYSTEMIC PRACTICE OR COMPLIANCE CONCERNS.
(d) UPON IDENTIFICATION OF A PERFORMANCE CONCERN, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE COUNTY
DEPARTMENT THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CONCERN;
(II) APPLICABLE PERFORMANCE METRICS OR STANDARDS NOT BEING
MET;
(III) SUPPORTING DATA OR FINDINGS; AND
(IV) NOTICE OF WHETHER OR NOT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IS
NECESSARY.
(e) A COUNTY DEPARTMENT HAS TEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION TO
SUBMIT A WRITTEN DISPUTE OF THE FINDINGS OF A STATE DEPARTMENT'S
PERFORMANCE CONCERNS. THE STATE DEPARTMENTS MUST RESPOND TO A
COUNTY DEPARTMENT'S DISPUTE WITHIN TEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING NOTICE OF THE DISPUTE.
(f) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE, TRAINING, AND PROGRAM SUPPORT THROUGHOUT ALL PHASES
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

OF PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT AND CORRECTIVE ACTION.
(6) (a) IF A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN IS REQUIRED, THE COUNTY
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN WITHIN TEN
BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS AN EXTENSION IS GRANTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
RULE, AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S PERFORMANCE
CONCERNS AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN MUST INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE AREAS OF NONCOMPLIANCE OR
UNDERPERFORMANCE;
(II) REQUIRED CORRECTIVE ACTIONS;
(III) IMPLEMENTATION TIMELINES FOR THE CORRECTIVE ACTIONS;
(IV) MEASURABLE INDICATORS OF PROGRESS TOWARD COMPLIANCE;
(V) REPORTING SCHEDULES;
(VI) A TARGET DATE FOR ACHIEVING COMPLIANCE, AS DETERMINED
BY THE STATE DEPARTMENTS; AND
(VII) A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN MONITORING PERIOD THAT
COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (6)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) WITHIN TEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT'S
SUBMISSION OF A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN, AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
(6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN OR REQUEST MODIFICATIONS TO THE CORRECTIVE
ACTION PLAN.
(d) THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN MONITORING PERIOD MUST BE NO
MORE THAN SIX MONTHS AND MAY INCLUDE CASE REVIEWS, SITE VISITS,
STAFF INTERVIEWS, DATA ANALYSIS, OR OTHER APPROPRIATE MEASURES.
(e) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS MAY EXTEND THE CORRECTIVE ACTION
PLAN MONITORING PERIOD ONLY WHEN NECESSARY TO ACCOUNT FOR DATA
AVAILABILITY OR A REPORTING DELAY. AN EXTENSION MUST BE BASED ON
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

OBJECTIVE CRITERIA, APPLIED CONSISTENTLY ACROSS COUNTY
DEPARTMENTS, AND DOCUMENTED IN WRITING.
(f) CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN REQUIREMENTS MUST BE ALIGNED
ACROSS STATE DEPARTMENTS TO ENSURE UNIFORMITY, TAKING INTO
ACCOUNT DIFFERENCES IN STATE AND FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.
(7) (a) IF A COUNTY DEPARTMENT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT OR AN APPROVED CORRECTIVE ACTION
PLAN, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE SANCTIONS.
(b) SANCTIONS MAY INCLUDE:
(I) DISALLOWANCE OF STATE FUNDS;
(II) ASSIGNMENT OF PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION TO ANOTHER
COUNTY DEPARTMENT; OR
(III) ASSUMPTION OF PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION BY A STATE
DEPARTMENT.
(c) IF NONCOMPLIANCE PRESENTS AN IMMINENT RISK TO THE HEALTH
OR SAFETY OF RECIPIENTS, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS MAY TAKE IMMEDIATE
ACTION AS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(8) THIS SECTION DOES NOT RESTRICT OR AFFECT THE POWERS,
DUTIES, OR FUNCTIONS OF A STATE DEPARTMENT AS AUTHORIZED OR
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ANY OTHER PROVISION OF STATE LAW.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26-1-144 as
follows:
26-1-144. Continuous quality improvement.
(1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND FINANCING AND DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, AND IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SHALL ESTABLISH A
CONTINUOUS QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROCESS TO REVIEW THE METRICS
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

REPORTED THROUGH COUNTY-LEVEL AND STATEWIDE PERFORMANCE DATA,
ERROR RATES, AND OTHER ERRORS AND INCONSISTENCIES TO IDENTIFY ROOT
CAUSES AND IMPLEMENT STRATEGIES TO IMPROVE ACCURACY AND
CONSISTENCY IN ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATIONS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EVERY
JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING AND DEPARTMENT
OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE PROVIDING AN UPDATE ON THE CONTINUOUS QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT PROCESS AND DATA ON THE IMPACT OF THE CONTINUOUS
QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROCESS ON THE METRICS INCLUDED IN THE
PROCESS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-1-138 as
follows:
25.5-1-138. Data transparency and public reporting - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADULT FINANCIAL PROGRAMS" MEANS A STATE-RUN BENEFIT
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND INCLUDES
THE OLD AGE PENSION, AID TO THE NEEDY DISABLED, AND HOME CARE
ALLOWANCE.
(b) "DEPARTMENTS" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND FINANCING, DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD.
(c) "PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS" MEANS THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF TITLE
25.5; THE CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 8 OF TITLE 25.5; THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE
26; THE COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 26.5; THE TEMPORARY
ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26-2-703; THE OLD AGE PENSION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

ARTICLE XXIV OF THE COLORADO CONSTITUTION; AND ADULT FINANCIAL
PROGRAMS.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 2027, AND MONTHLY THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, IN COLLABORATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD, SHALL ESTABLISH A SINGLE, SHARED ONLINE
DASHBOARD USED TO PUBLISH COUNTY-LEVEL AND STATEWIDE
PERFORMANCE ON THE METRICS FOR EACH OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
PROGRAMS:
(a) FOR THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF TITLE 25.5 AND THE CHILDREN'S BASIC
HEALTH PLAN ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 8 OF TITLE 25.5:
(I) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL APPLICATIONS
APPROVED WITHIN THE TIMELINES REQUIRED IN FEDERAL LAW AND
REGULATION FOR ALL APPLICATIONS, INCLUDING APPLICATIONS BASED ON
DISABILITY;
(II) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL APPLICATIONS
DENIED WITHIN THE TIMELINES REQUIRED IN FEDERAL LAW AND REGULATION
FOR ALL APPLICATIONS, INCLUDING APPLICATIONS BASED ON DISABILITY;
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF RENEWAL APPLICATIONS PROCESSED
EACH MONTH, INCLUDING:
(A) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS RENEWED USING EXISTING DATA
SOURCES AND THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS RENEWED USING ADDITIONAL
COMPLETED DOCUMENTATION SUBMITTED BY THE RECIPIENTS;
(B) THE NUMBER OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL
APPLICATIONS PROCESSED AND DETERMINED INELIGIBLE;
(C) THE NUMBER OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL
APPLICATIONS DENIED FOR PROCEDURAL REASONS; AND
(D) THE NUMBER OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL
APPLICATIONS PENDING REVIEW;
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(IV) THE NUMBER OF FORMAL COMPLAINTS OR APPEALS REGARDING
ELIGIBILITY, BENEFITS, OR SERVICES FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING; AND
(V) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL
APPLICATIONS THAT ARE PENDING DETERMINATION AND THE TOTAL NUMBER
DEEMED UNTIMELY BASED ON THE TIMELINES REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW
AND REGULATION FOR APPLICATIONS BASED ON DISABILITY, AND FOR ALL
OTHER APPLICATIONS;
(b) FOR THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM,
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE 26:
(I) THE RATE OF APPLICATION PROCESSING TIMELINESS FOR
STANDARD APPLICATIONS;
(II) THE RATE OF APPLICATION PROCESSING TIMELINESS FOR
EXPEDITED APPLICATIONS; AND
(III) THE RATE OF RECERTIFICATION PROCESSING TIMELINESS;
(c) FOR THE CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 26.5:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND APPLICATIONS
FOR REDETERMINATION APPROVED WITHIN THE TIMELINES REQUIRED BY
RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD; AND
(II) ENROLLMENT IN EACH OF THE FOLLOWING INCOME ELIGIBILITY
TIERS:
(A) ONE HUNDRED THIRTY PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE
AND BELOW; AND
(B) ABOVE ONE HUNDRED THIRTY PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL
POVERTY LINE;
(d) FOR THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES
PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-2-703, THE PERCENTAGE OF
APPLICATIONS AND REDETERMINATIONS APPROVED WITHIN THE TIMELINES
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

REQUIRED BY RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES;
(e) FOR ADULT FINANCIAL PROGRAMS, THE PERCENTAGE OF
APPLICATIONS AND REDETERMINATIONS APPROVED WITHIN THE TIMELINES
REQUIRED BY RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES;
AND
(f) FOR EACH OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS:
(I) THE MONTHLY CASELOAD;
(II) THE PERCENTAGE OF APPLICATIONS, ENROLLMENTS, AND
RENEWALS PROCESSED THROUGH THE STATE'S ONLINE SYSTEM FOR
APPLICATION AND MANAGEMENT OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS, AND
THE PERCENTAGE OF APPLICATIONS, ENROLLMENTS, AND RENEWALS
PROCESSED BY OTHER METHODS; AND
(III) ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, THE NUMBER OF APPEALS FILED WITH
THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE COURTS THAT NAME A COUNTY AS A PARTY.
(3) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(f)(III) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DATA REPORTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION MUST:
(b) BE PUBLISHED ON EACH OF THE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE'S IN A
PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE FORMAT;
(c) BE UPDATED MONTHLY AND PUBLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
DATA PRIVACY AND CONFIDENTIALITY LAWS OF THE STATE; AND
(d) BE MAINTAINED FROM PREVIOUS MONTHS IN A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE MANNER.
(4) BEGINNING IN SEPTEMBER 2026, AND MONTHLY THEREAFTER,
EACH COUNTY DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION DETAILED
IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, OTHER THAN THE INFORMATION
DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(V) OF THIS SECTION, TO EACH RESPECTIVE
DEPARTMENT.
(5) THE STATE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES AND THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY
CHILDHOOD, SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL SUPPORT, TECHNOLOGY
ASSISTANCE, AND TRAINING TO THE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, AS
REASONABLY NECESSARY, ON HOW TO PROVIDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION TO THE RESPECTIVE DEPARTMENTS.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 8 to article 1
of title 26 as follows:
PART 8
DELIVERY OF PUBLIC BENEFITS
26-1-801. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) IN ADDITION TO NEAR-TERM POLICY CHANGES NEEDED TO
STABILIZE THE SAFETY NET, COLORADO SHOULD DEVELOP A
COMPREHENSIVE, LONG-TERM PLAN TO REDESIGN THE STATE'S PUBLIC
BENEFITS SYSTEM TO SUPPORT COST MITIGATION, INCREASED
ADMINISTRATIVE EFFICIENCY, AND THE DELIVERY OF HIGHER-QUALITY
SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES;
(b) TO ENSURE EFFECTIVE CHANGE MANAGEMENT AND TO MINIMIZE
DISRUPTION TO SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES, THE APPROACH
TO REDESIGNING THE SAFETY NET MUST OCCUR WITHIN ESTABLISHED
TIMELINES AND INCLUDE STRUCTURED PLANNING PROCESSES, INTENTIONAL
STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT, AND REGULAR PROGRESS REPORTS TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(c) IT IS NECESSARY FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, IN PARTNERSHIP WITH COUNTIES, FRONT LINE
WORKERS, AND OTHER INTERESTED STAKEHOLDERS, TO CONDUCT A
STRUCTURED, FACILITATED PROCESS IN ORDER TO ENSURE THAT ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, COLORADO WILL OPERATE A REDESIGNED PUBLIC
BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL CONSISTING OF NO MORE THAN TWELVE
COHORTS OF COUNTIES WORKING TOGETHER TO ADMINISTER PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; AND
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(d) BECAUSE ACCESS TO PUBLIC BENEFITS IS FUNDAMENTAL TO THE
HEALTH, STABILITY, AND ECONOMIC SECURITY OF COLORADO RESIDENTS,
THE SYSTEMS USED TO ADMINISTER THOSE BENEFITS MUST BE ACCESSIBLE,
EFFICIENT, AND RELIABLE.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE STATE'S CURRENT BENEFITS TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE
IS FRAGMENTED, DIFFICULT TO NAVIGATE, AND IMPOSES ADMINISTRATIVE
BURDENS ON APPLICANTS, RECIPIENTS, AND STAFF WHO DETERMINE
APPLICANT ELIGIBILITY, WHICH MAY LIMIT ACCESS TO SERVICES FOR
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES;
(b) MODERN, INTEGRATED TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS ARE NECESSARY
TO SUPPORT EFFICIENT PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION, IMPROVE RECIPIENT
EXPERIENCE, AND ENSURE TIMELY AND EFFECTIVE DELIVERY OF BENEFITS
AND SERVICES;
(c) COLORADO HAS THE OPPORTUNITY TO REDESIGN ITS BENEFITS
TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE THROUGH THE DEVELOPMENT OF A
STATE-OWNED, MODULAR, AND INTEROPERABLE PLATFORM TO IMPROVE
COORDINATION ACROSS PROGRAMS AND ENHANCE SERVICE DELIVERY; AND
(d) REDESIGNING THE STATE'S BENEFITS TECHNOLOGY
INFRASTRUCTURE IS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT EFFECTIVE PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATION AND SERVICE DELIVERY UNDER THE REDESIGNED PUBLIC
BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL. THE REDESIGN OF THE PUBLIC BENEFITS
DELIVERY MODEL WILL BE MOST EFFECTIVE WHEN THE STATE AGENCIES
RESPONSIBLE FOR BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION COORDINATE ACROSS
PROGRAMS, PRIORITIZE IMPLEMENTATION OF REDESIGN EFFORTS, AND
PROVIDE REPORTS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGARDING PROGRESS
TOWARD THESE GOALS.
(3) THEREFORE, IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT
THE FOLLOWING PRINCIPLES GUIDE BENEFITS TECHNOLOGY REDESIGN:
(a) THE STATE SHOULD DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A STATE-OWNED
BENEFITS PLATFORM THAT SUPPORTS MODULAR DESIGN, INTEROPERABILITY,
AND LONG-TERM ADAPTABILITY THAT ENABLE THE MEASUREMENT OF
PROGRAM OUTCOMES AND USER EXPERIENCE;
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(b) THE STATE SHOULD DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A CENTRALIZED
SYSTEM THROUGH WHICH RESIDENTS MAY ACCESS, APPLY FOR, AND MANAGE
BENEFITS ACROSS MULTIPLE PROGRAMS IN A MANNER THAT IS ACCESSIBLE
TO INDIVIDUALS OF ALL ABILITIES, LANGUAGES, AND LEVELS OF DIGITAL
ACCESS;
(c) THE STATE SHOULD IMPLEMENT A WHOLE-PERSON APPROACH TO
BENEFITS ADMINISTRATION BY STREAMLINING AND INTEGRATING INTAKE,
ELIGIBILITY, AND ENROLLMENT PROCESSES TO IMPROVE COORDINATION AND
REDUCE ADMINISTRATIVE BURDEN ON APPLICANTS, RECIPIENTS, AND STAFF
WHO DETERMINE APPLICANT ELIGIBILITY; AND
(d) THE STATE SHOULD ENSURE CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT AND
RESPONSIVENESS BY ADOPTING MODERN PRODUCT MANAGEMENT PRACTICES
IN ITS APPROACH TO BENEFITS TECHNOLOGY REDESIGN, INCLUDING ONGOING
USER RESEARCH, STATE-LED PRIORITIZATION OF SYSTEM REQUIREMENTS AND
ENHANCEMENTS, AND ITERATIVE, AGILE DEVELOPMENT INFORMED BY
PERFORMANCE METRICS AND USER EXPERIENCE DATA.
26-1-802. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "COHORT" MEANS A GROUP OF COUNTIES THAT ARE REQUIRED TO
WORK TOGETHER TO ADMINISTER PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS THROUGH
SHARED WORK AND POOLED RESOURCES. A COHORT'S WORK IS INFORMED BY
THE TRANSITION PLAN, REPORT, AND RECOMMENDATIONS REQUIRED BY THIS
PART 8.
(2) "CROSS-DEPARTMENTAL POLICY ALIGNMENT TEAM" OR "TEAM"
MEANS THE CROSS-DEPARTMENTAL POLICY ALIGNMENT TEAM CREATED IN
SECTION 26-1-808.
(3) "IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP" MEANS THE IMPLEMENTATION
WORK GROUP CREATED IN SECTION 26-1-806.
(4) "PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS" MEANS THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF TITLE 25.5;
CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 8 OF
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

TITLE 25.5, THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED IN PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE 26, THE COLORADO
CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN PART 1 OF ARTICLE 4 OF
TITLE 26.5; THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES PROGRAM
DESCRIBED IN PART 7 OF ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE 26; THE OLD AGE PENSION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION;
AND THE ADULT FINANCIAL PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN PART 1 OF ARTICLE 2
OF THIS TITLE 26, WHICH INCLUDE THE OLD AGE PENSION, AID TO THE NEEDY
DISABLED, AND HOME CARE ALLOWANCE.
(5) "PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL" MEANS A SYSTEM IN WHICH
THE ADMINISTRATION, PROCESSING, AND DELIVERY OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
BENEFITS AND SERVICES ARE CONSOLIDATED INTO A SINGLE CENTRALIZED
AND UNIFORM DELIVERY MODEL.
(6) "SHARED SERVICES" MEANS AN ADMINISTRATIVE OR
OPERATIONAL FUNCTION PERFORMED BY A COUNTY DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF
OF COUNTY DEPARTMENTS IN A COHORT AND DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION
AND COLLABORATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND ALL COUNTY
DEPARTMENTS. SHARED SERVICES INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
(a) A CALL CENTER TO HANDLE ALL CALLS RELATED TO PROGRAM
ELIGIBILITY ON BEHALF OF ALL COUNTY DEPARTMENTS;
(b) QUALITY ASSURANCE TO HANDLE ALL RESPONSIBILITIES RELATED
TO THE QUALITY OF ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION FOR THE PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; AND
(c) SECURITY ADMINISTRATION SERVICES TO MANAGE THE PROVISION
AND REVOCATION OF ACCESS BY COUNTY PERSONNEL TO STATE-PROVIDED
TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS AND SYSTEMS.
(7) "STATE DEPARTMENTS" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, AND
THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD.
(8) "THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR" MEANS THE ENTITY CONTRACTED
BY THE STATE DEPARTMENTS TO ASSIST THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP
PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-1-805.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(9) "TRANSITION PLAN" MEANS THE TRANSITION PLAN DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 26-1-807.
26-1-803. Public benefits delivery model - state departments
responsibilities.
(1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL
OVERSEE A STREAMLINED PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL MADE UP OF
NO MORE THAN TWELVE COHORTS. EACH COHORT SHALL COORDINATE AND
DISTRIBUTE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY AND CASE
PROCESSING WORK ACCORDING TO A SHARED WORKFLOW, AS DETERMINED
BY THE TRANSITION PLAN.
(2) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PUBLIC
BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL IS IMPLEMENTED WITH CONSISTENCY ACROSS
THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND COHORTS, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE
DIFFERENCES AND REQUIREMENTS OF EACH STATE DEPARTMENT IN
ADMINISTERING THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL EMPLOY UP TO
TWELVE HUMAN SERVICES AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM REGIONAL
MANAGERS WHO ARE GEOGRAPHICALLY DISPERSED THROUGHOUT THE STATE
TO SUPPORT THE COHORTS AND PROVIDE GUIDANCE, DIRECTION, AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO THE COHORTS TO ENSURE CONSISTENT,
EFFECTIVE, COMPLIANT, AND ACCOUNTABLE DELIVERY OF PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.
(4) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS, THROUGH REGULAR MONITORING AND
SUPERVISION, SHALL ENSURE COHORTS COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS PART 8 AND WITH RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENTS.
(5) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS RETAIN SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
OVER THE COHORTS AND COUNTIES WITHIN THE COHORTS UNDER THE PUBLIC
BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL. THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL MONITOR
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM COMPLIANCE AND INSTITUTE CORRECTIVE
ACTION PROTOCOLS, WHICH MUST BE ALIGNED ACROSS THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS AND INCLUDED IN ALL PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS
REQUIRED BY SECTION 26-1-804. THE STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL
COMMUNICATE WITH COHORTS AS NEEDED REGARDING COMPLIANCE,
CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS, AND PROGRAM-SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

ISSUES.
(6) FULL IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY
MODEL IS CONTINGENT ON AVAILABLE AND OPERATIONAL READINESS OF
SYSTEM ENHANCEMENTS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT CROSS-COUNTY WORK
SHARING. THE STATE DEPARTMENTS MUST ENSURE THAT COHORTS AND
COUNTIES ARE PROVIDED ADEQUATE TIME, TRAINING, AND SUPPORT TO
IMPLEMENT THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL, INCLUDING NEW
WORKFORCE PROCESSES, UPDATED TECHNOLOGY, AND OPERATIONAL
MODELS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT CROSS-COUNTY WORK SHARING.
(7) A COUNTY DEPARTMENT IN A COHORT IS NOT FINANCIALLY OR
LEGALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF ANOTHER COUNTY
DEPARTMENT IN THE COHORT, SUBJECT TO THE TERMS OF A
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENTS OR
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN COUNTIES, TO THE EXTENT
ALLOWABLE UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
26-1-804. Performance-based contracts.
(1) THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND COHORTS, OR COUNTY
DEPARTMENTS WITHIN A COHORT, SHALL ENTER INTO A PERIODICALLY
NEGOTIATED PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT THAT IDENTIFIES THE DUTIES
AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF EACH PARTY UNDER THE PUBLIC BENEFITS
DELIVERY MODEL.
(2) STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL DEVELOP PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACTS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COHORTS, AND
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS MUST COMPLY WITH STATE AND FEDERAL
LAW.
(3) AT A MINIMUM, A PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT MUST
INCLUDE:
(a) MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED FOR THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS AND COHORTS, OR COUNTY DEPARTMENTS WITHIN A COHORT,
IN THE TRANSITION PLAN, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 26-1-807;
(b) MEASURABLE OUTCOME- AND PERFORMANCE-BASED METRICS
AND ANY ASSOCIATED INCENTIVE PAYMENT STRUCTURES;
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(c) CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS WHEN A COHORT OR COUNTY
DEPARTMENT WITHIN A COHORT FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACT; AND
(d) OPERATIONAL PLANS FOR SHARED WORK AND SHARED
RESOURCES.
26-1-805. Third-party contractor.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SHALL CONTRACT WITH
AT LEAST ONE THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR TO ASSIST THE IMPLEMENTATION
WORK GROUP IN DEVELOPING AND IMPLEMENTING THE TRANSITION PLAN
AND CORRESPONDING REPORT AND DEVELOPING RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL.
(2) AT A MINIMUM, THE SELECTED THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR IS
RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(a) PRESENTING MULTIPLE COHORT-BASED MODEL OPTIONS TO THE
STATE DEPARTMENTS FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
PROGRAMS. THE COHORT-BASED MODEL OPTIONS MUST:
(I) VARY IN SIZE AND STRUCTURE;
(II) IMPROVE THE QUALITY OF SERVICES RENDERED TO PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS; AND
(III) INCLUDE FISCAL, OPERATIONAL, AND SHARED SERVICES
CONSIDERATIONS, THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE
ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, SHARED SERVICES, AND STRATEGIES
THAT SUPPORT COMPLIANCE, COST CONTAINMENT, MAXIMIZATION OF
EXISTING CAPACITY AND STRENGTHS, AND INCREASED EFFICACY. THE
CONSIDERATIONS AND STRATEGIES MUST DRAW UPON AVAILABLE DATA,
RESEARCH, EXISTING STRUCTURES, AND EXAMPLES FROM OTHER STATES.
(b) CONVENING AND FACILITATING DISCUSSIONS AMONG THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS, COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, FRONT LINE WORKERS, AND OTHER
RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS THROUGH THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP
TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE TRANSITION PLAN AND
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

CORRESPONDING REPORT FOR THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL;
(c) FACILITATING THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE TRANSITION PLAN AND
CORRESPONDING REPORT IN ALIGNMENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
TRANSITION PLAN;
(d) ENSURING INTENTIONAL OUTREACH TO AND ENGAGEMENT WITH
COUNTIES OF VARYING SIZES AND GEOGRAPHIES, INCLUDING SMALL AND
RURAL COUNTIES; ADVOCATES; FRONTLINE WORKERS EMPLOYED BY THE
COUNTY DEPARTMENTS; COMMUNITY PARTNERS; AND PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT REPRESENTATIVES, TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT OF
THE TRANSITION PLAN AND CORRESPONDING REPORT;
(e) RESEARCHING AND PRESENTING OPTIONS FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT CASE MANAGEMENT MODELS AND FOR TRACKING
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS' EXPERIENCES AND ENGAGEMENT
THROUGHOUT THE APPLICATION PROCESS, ENROLLMENT PROCESS, AND
UTILIZATION OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS, TO IMPROVE THE QUALITY
OF CUSTOMER SERVICE AND OUTCOMES; AND
(f) FACILITATING DISCUSSIONS AND STRATEGY DEVELOPMENT
RELATED TO THE IMPACT OF CHANGES IN THE AVAILABILITY OF STATE AND
FEDERAL FUNDING ON PUBLIC BENEFIT PROGRAMS, TAKING INTO
CONSIDERATION THE IMPACTS OF H.R. 1, 119TH CONGRESS (2025-2026),
PUB.L. 119-21, AND THE FINANCIAL IMPACTS ON ERROR RATES, REDUCTIONS
IN RESOURCES, AND INCREASED WORKLOAD.
(3) THE THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR SHALL BE SELECTED THROUGH
A PROCESS THAT INCLUDES COMMUNITY ADVOCATES, FRONT LINE WORKERS,
AND REPRESENTATIVES FROM COUNTIES, INCLUDING COUNTIES WITH RURAL,
URBAN, SUBURBAN, AND RESORT COMMUNITIES AND COUNTIES WITH
VARYING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CASELOADS. THE THIRD-PARTY
CONTRACTOR MUST HAVE A DEMONSTRATED RECORD OF EXPERTISE IN
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION, FISCAL MODELING,
FACILITATION OF MULTIPLE WORKING AND ADVISORY GROUP STRUCTURES;
IN STRUCTURED STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT; AND A DEMONSTRATED
ABILITY TO EFFECTIVELY OPERATE AND ENGAGE STAKEHOLDERS ACROSS THE
STATE TO ARRIVE AT RECOMMENDATIONS THAT REFLECT A CONSENSUS,
WHEN POSSIBLE.
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(4) UPON APPROVAL BY THE STATE DEPARTMENTS, THE THIRD-PARTY
CONTRACTOR MAY SUBCONTRACT WITH OTHER INDEPENDENT ENTITIES WITH
RELEVANT EXPERIENCE TO CARRY OUT ONE OR MORE OF THE REQUIREMENTS
LISTED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) COUNTY DEPARTMENTS AND STATE DEPARTMENTS SHALL
COOPERATE WITH REASONABLE REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION RECEIVED
FROM THE THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR OR A THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR'S
SUBCONTRACTOR.
(6) THE SELECTION OF THE THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR IS EXEMPT
FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE "PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES 101 TO
112 OF TITLE 24.
26-1-806. Implementation work group - subgroups - reports.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE DEPARTMENTS, IN
COLLABORATION WITH COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SHALL ESTABLISH AN
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP TO WORK WITH THE THIRD-PARTY
CONTRACTOR AND SUBGROUP DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION TO DEVELOP THE TRANSITION PLAN AND CORRESPONDING REPORT
AND TO DEVELOP RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY
MODEL.
(2) THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP IS COMPOSED OF THE
FOLLOWING SEVENTEEN MEMBERS:
(a) SIX MEMBERS REPRESENTING COUNTIES, APPOINTED BY A
COLORADO ORGANIZATION THAT ASSISTS COUNTY COMMISSIONERS,
MAYORS, AND COUNCIL MEMBERS AND ENCOURAGES COUNTIES TO WORK
TOGETHER, WHO MUST BE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
AND INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO MUST BE A COUNTY COMMISSIONER,
HUMAN SERVICES DIRECTOR, OR A DESIGNEE OF A COUNTY COMMISSIONER
OR HUMAN SERVICES DIRECTOR, WHO HAS RELEVANT SUBJECT MATTER
EXPERTISE IN HUMAN SERVICES;
(II) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO MUST REPRESENT A RURAL
COUNTY; AND
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(III) AT LEAST TWO MEMBERS WHO MUST BE COUNTY
REPRESENTATIVES REPRESENTING COUNTIES WITH HIGH HUMAN SERVICES
CASELOADS;
(b) THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(c) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND FINANCING, APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING;
(d) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES;
(e) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY
CHILDHOOD, APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT
OF EARLY CHILDHOOD; AND
(f) FOUR REPRESENTATIVES FROM PHILANTHROPIC ORGANIZATIONS,
COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS, OR MEMBER EXPERIENCE COUNCILS WHO ARE
NOT STATE OR COUNTY GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEES AND HAVE RELEVANT
SUBJECT MATTER EXPERTISE:
(I) ONE APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING;
(II) ONE APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES;
(III) ONE APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD; AND
(IV) ONE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR; AND
(g) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A NONSUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE WHO
DETERMINES ELIGIBILITY OR PROCESSES CASES FROM A COUNTY
DEPARTMENT, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(3) (a) THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP SHALL CONVENE A
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

SUBGROUP TO ADVISE THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP ON THE
DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE TRANSITION PLAN AND
CORRESPONDING REPORT.
(b) THE SUBGROUP MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS AND
REPRESENTATIVES:
(I) BENEFIT RECIPIENTS OR THE PARENTS OF CHILD BENEFIT
RECIPIENTS;
(II) HUMAN SERVICES PROVIDERS AND PROVIDERS ENROLLED IN THE
STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(III) COUNTY PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFIT ELIGIBILITY EMPLOYEES
AND CASE WORKERS;
(IV) REPRESENTATIVES FROM THE SOUTHERN UTE INDIAN TRIBE
AND THE UTE MOUNTAIN UTE TRIBE;
(V) DISABILITY ADVOCATES;
(VI) REPRESENTATIVES OF ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS THAT
REPRESENT SENIOR CITIZENS AND CHILDREN AND ADVOCATE FOR POVERTY
REFORM;
(VII) REPRESENTATIVES OF BUSINESSES AND EMPLOYERS THAT
PARTICIPATE IN WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES FOR PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; AND
(VIII) REPRESENTATIVES OF MANAGED CARE ENTITIES.
(c) MEMBERS OF THE SUBGROUP MUST NOT BE MEMBERS WHO SERVE
ON THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP.
(d) THE SUBGROUP FUNCTIONS IN AN ADVISORY ROLE TO THE
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP.
(e) THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP SHALL SOLICIT INPUT ON THE
DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE TRANSITION PLAN AND
CORRESPONDING REPORT FROM THE SUBGROUP AND INCLUDE THE
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

SUBGROUP'S INPUT IN THE FINAL REPORT.
(4) THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP MAY CONVENE ADDITIONAL
SUBGROUPS TO ASSIST THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP ON TOPICS THAT
MAY INCLUDE:
(a) TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION;
(b) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENT ENGAGEMENT, CASE
MANAGEMENT, AND PROGRAM DELIVERY PROCESS IMPROVEMENT;
(c) FISCAL, ALLOCATION, AND GOVERNANCE REFORM;
(d) WORKFORCE TRANSITION AND LABOR PROTECTIONS;
(e) PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS AND OUTCOME MEASURES; OR
(f) ANY OTHER TOPIC THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP DEEMS
APPROPRIATE.
(5) (a) IN DEVELOPING THE TRANSITION PLAN AND CORRESPONDING
REPORT, THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP AND SUBGROUPS SHALL
ENGAGE WITH, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, INTERESTED AND IMPACTED
INDIVIDUALS FROM ALL AREAS OF THE STATE, INCLUDING URBAN,
SUBURBAN, AND RURAL AREAS, AND ACROSS PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS,
AND SHALL ACTIVELY SEEK THE INPUT AND GUIDANCE OF PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS, HUMAN SERVICES PROVIDERS, MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDERS, COUNTY ELIGIBILITY EMPLOYEES AND
CASEWORKERS, THE SOUTHERN UTE INDIAN TRIBE AND UTE MOUNTAIN UTE
TRIBE, ADVOCACY GROUPS, AND OTHER INTERESTED AND IMPACTED
COMMUNITY MEMBERS. THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP MAY INCLUDE
DIFFERENT APPROACHES AND MULTIPLE OPTIONS FOR THE PUBLIC BENEFITS
DELIVERY MODEL IN ITS REPORTS OR RECOMMENDATIONS. A MEMBER OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP MAY SUBMIT A MINORITY REPORT WITH AN
ALTERNATIVE APPROACH OR RECOMMENDATIONS AS PART OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP'S FINAL REPORT.
(b) TO FACILITATE THE ENGAGEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP MUST ENGAGE
WITH STAKEHOLDERS THROUGH PUBLIC MEETINGS, WORKING SESSIONS,
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

WRITTEN COMMENTS, AND PUBLIC REPORTING OF RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
THE TRANSITION PLAN.
(c) TO INCREASE EFFICIENCY AND MEET WITH AS MANY
STAKEHOLDERS AS POSSIBLE, THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP MAY MEET
WITH STAKEHOLDERS USING ELECTRONIC OR DIGITAL PLATFORMS AND
FORMATS.
(6) (a) FROM JULY 1, 2026, THROUGH JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS, IN COLLABORATION WITH COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SHALL
PROVIDE MONTHLY PROGRESS REPORTS ON THE WORK OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE
JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE, AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
(b) FROM JANUARY 1, 2027, THROUGH JULY 1, 2028, THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS, IN COLLABORATION WITH COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, SHALL
PROVIDE QUARTERLY PROGRESS REPORTS ON THE WORK OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP AND DEVELOPMENT OF THE TRANSITION
PLAN AND CORRESPONDING REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE
JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE, AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
26-1-807. Transition plan.
(1) THE IMPLEMENTATION WORK GROUP SHALL WORK WITH THE
THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR TO DESIGN A TRANSITION PLAN FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS UNDER THE PUBLIC
BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL. THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST BE DELIVERED TO
THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE BY JANUARY 1, 2027.
(2) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST TAKE INTO ACCOUNT THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS' AND COUNTY DEPARTMENTS' EXISTING WORK, STRUCTURES,
AGREEMENTS, AND UPDATES TO ENSURE THE NEW PUBLIC BENEFITS
DELIVERY MODEL BUILDS ON EXISTING PROCESSES AND PROCEDURES. THE
TRANSITION PLAN MUST ALSO CONSIDER PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODELS
USED BY OTHER STATES THAT OPERATE A COUNTY-ADMINISTERED PUBLIC
BENEFITS SYSTEM.
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(3) AT A MINIMUM, THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST ADDRESS THE
FOLLOWING:
(a) FOR THE STATE DEPARTMENTS:
(I) FUNDING, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND TRAINING FOR THE
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS THE INDIVIDUAL STATE DEPARTMENTS
OVERSEE;
(II) STANDARDS FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY,
SERVICE DELIVERY, EFFICIENCY, AND PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND HOW
THOSE STANDARDS ARE ALIGNED ACROSS PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
(III) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL AND
STATE LAW;
(IV) POLICY ANALYSIS AND GUIDANCE FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS THROUGH SHARED WORK AND POOLED
RESOURCES IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CROSS-DEPARTMENTAL POLICY
ALIGNMENT TEAM;
(V) TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE AND IMPROVEMENTS
NECESSARY TO ENABLE THE RECOMMENDED PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY
MODEL AND SUPPORT COHORTS OR INDIVIDUAL COUNTIES WITHIN COHORTS
IN MEETING THE PERFORMANCE AND OUTCOME MEASURES ESTABLISHED IN
THE PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS REQUIRED IN SECTION 26-1-804;
(VI) CONTINUOUS QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROCESSES;
(VII) MANAGEMENT EVALUATION AND QUALITY ASSURANCE
PROCESSES;
(VIII) ACHIEVEMENT OF METRICS ESTABLISHED IN THE
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS;
(IX) INITIATION OF CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS;
(X) PUBLICATION OF PUBLIC-FACING PERFORMANCE DATA ON A
MONTHLY BASIS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-1-144;
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(XI) ESTABLISHMENT AND MONITORING OF THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210 AND ANY
OTHER CENTRALIZED SERVICES AND PROCESSES; AND
(XII) DEVELOPMENT OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENT
EXPERIENCE MEASUREMENT TOOLS, INCLUDING SURVEYS THAT CAPTURE
EXPERIENCES ACROSS PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.
(b) FOR THE COHORTS:
(I) STANDARDIZED AND CONSISTENT ADMINISTRATION OF PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
(II) STANDARDIZED AND CONSISTENT GOVERNANCE AND
COORDINATION STRUCTURE;
(III) ACHIEVEMENT OF METRICS ESTABLISHED IN
PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTS;
(IV) DATA TRACKING AND REPORTING FOR CONTINUOUS QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT PROCESSES AND PERFORMANCE REPORTING;
(V) REQUIRED PARTICIPATION IN THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210 AND ANY OTHER
SHARED SERVICE MODELS;
(VI) REQUIRED PARTICIPATION IN CONTINUOUS QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT PROCESSES ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 26-1-144;
(VII) REQUIRED PARTICIPATION IN STATE-PROVIDED TRAINING AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE;
(VIII) REQUIRED IMPLEMENTATION OF STATE-PROVIDED
TECHNOLOGY TO MEET FEDERAL OR STATE REQUIREMENTS;
(IX) COMPLIANCE WITH CORRECTIVE ACTION PROTOCOLS;
(X) STANDARDIZED AND CONSISTENT PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
RECIPIENT ELIGIBILITY, ENROLLMENT, AND ENGAGEMENT PROTOCOLS;
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(XI) CONSISTENT USE OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM RECIPIENT
EXPERIENCE MEASUREMENT TOOLS, INCLUDING SURVEYS THAT CAPTURE
EXPERIENCE ACROSS THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS; AND
(XII) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE OPERATION OF SHARED SERVICES.
(4) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST:
(a) ESTABLISH RECOMMENDATIONS, OPTIONS, AND MODELS FOR A
COHORT-BASED PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL THAT INCLUDES NO
MORE THAN TWELVE COHORTS AND COMPONENTS THAT ALIGN WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART 8;
(b) ENSURE THAT THE TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
NEEDED TO SUPPORT THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL ARE IDENTIFIED
AND ENSURE THAT TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION PROCEEDS
INDEPENDENTLY AS AN ESSENTIAL ENABLER OF PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY,
DESIGNED TO BE FLEXIBLE TO SUPPORT A RANGE OF STRUCTURES, PROMOTE
INTEROPERABILITY, DATA SECURITY, AND EQUITABLE ACCESS FOR
RECIPIENTS AND STAFF. TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION MUST NOT BE
DELAYED OR CONSTRAINED BY OTHER ASPECTS OF THE TRANSITION PLAN.
(c) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ESTABLISHING A COHORT OR
STATEWIDE SHARED SERVICES MODEL FOR KEY ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS
IN THE PUBLIC BENEFITS DELIVERY MODEL, INCLUDING A CALL CENTER,
QUALITY ASSURANCE, AND SECURITY ADMINISTRATION SERVICES, AND
IDENTIFY ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS THAT ARE SUITABLE FOR SHARED
DELIVERY AND ARE NECESSARY TO IMPROVE CONSISTENCY, REDUCE
DUPLICATION, AND ENSURE COMPLIANCE;
(d) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE ROLE, STRUCTURE,
AUTHORITY, AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE REGIONAL MANAGERS DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 26-1-803, INCLUDING THE GEOGRAPHICAL DISTRIBUTION OF THE
REGIONAL MANAGERS THROUGHOUT THE STATE, TO SUPPORT PERFORMANCE,
ACCOUNTABILITY, AND COMMUNICATION OF COUNTY DEPARTMENTS AND
COHORTS;
(e) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ESTABLISHING A PHASED
OUTCOME MEASUREMENT FRAMEWORK FOR PERFORMANCE-BASED
CONTRACTS THAT INCLUDES BASELINE DATA DEVELOPMENT,
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

ADMINISTRATIVE PERFORMANCE METRICS, AND CLIENT-CENTERED OUTCOME
MEASURES THAT ALIGN METRICS ACROSS THE STATE DEPARTMENTS AND
SUPPORT A TRANSITION TOWARD HOLISTIC, FAMILY-CENTERED OUTCOMES
RELATED TO STABILITY, ACCESS, AND WELL-BEING;
(f) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE DESIGN AND
IMPLEMENTATION OF A PUBLIC REPORTING FRAMEWORK, INCLUDING TIMELY
PUBLICATION OF COHORT AND STATEWIDE PERFORMANCE DATA, AND
ANNUAL REPORTS OF THE DATA TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE
JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE, THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. THE TRANSITION
PLAN MUST ALSO INCLUDE PERFORMANCE DATA REPORTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-138 AND THE FOLLOWING METRICS:
(I) FOR THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF TITLE 25.5:
(A) THE PERCENTAGE OF INITIAL APPLICATIONS AND RENEWAL
APPLICATIONS DETERMINED ELIGIBLE DURING THE NINETY DAY
RECONSIDERATION PERIOD, IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 CFR 435.916
(b)(2)(III); AND
(B) THE PERCENTAGE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION CHANGE
REQUESTS FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ENROLLMENT APPROVED WITHIN THE
FEDERALLY REQUIRED TIMELINES AND THE PERCENTAGE DENIED WITHIN THE
FEDERALLY REQUIRED TIMELINES; AND
(II) FOR EACH PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, THE AVERAGE CALL
TIME, INCLUDING THE CALL TIME AND EXPERIENCE RATING FOR CALLS THAT
OCCUR AT A COHORT CALL CENTER.
(g) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS BASED ON FISCAL MODELING,
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT REQUIREMENTS OF FEDERAL LAW, FOR AN
INTEGRATED ALLOCATION COMMITTEE THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A BALANCED MEMBERSHIP OF REPRESENTATIVES FROM STATE
AGENCIES, THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE, COUNTY DEPARTMENTS, THE FAMILY
VOICE COUNCIL WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, FRONT LINE
WORKERS, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS WITH RELEVANT EXPERIENCE;
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(II) ALIGNMENT AND INTEGRATION OF EXISTING ALLOCATION
COMMITTEES AND CURRENT STRUCTURES FOR ALLOCATING AVAILABLE
FUNDING IN EACH PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM TO A SINGLE INTEGRATED
ALLOCATION COMMITTEE;
(III) A GOVERNANCE AND VOTING STRUCTURE FOR
DECISION-MAKING; AND
(IV) DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE INTEGRATED ALLOCATION
COMMITTEE, INCLUDING ALLOCATION OF AVAILABLE FUNDING BASED UPON:
(A) DATA METRICS RELATED TO COMMUNITY NEED; AND
(B) SPENDING PRIORITIES BASED ON AVAILABLE ALLOCATIONS AND
THE RECOMMENDATIONS DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(e) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(h) INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR INTEGRATION OF CURRENT
RULE-MAKING STRUCTURES AND PROCESSES ACROSS STATE DEPARTMENTS,
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT REQUIREMENTS OF FEDERAL LAW.
26-1-808. State cross-departmental policy alignment team.
(1) THERE IS CREATED IN THE STATE DEPARTMENT THE STATE
CROSS-DEPARTMENTAL POLICY ALIGNMENT TEAM.
(2) THE TEAM CONSISTS OF STAFF DESIGNATED BY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTORS OF THE STATE DEPARTMENTS. THE STAFF DESIGNATED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) MUST HAVE SUBJECT MATTER EXPERTISE ON THE
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS AND DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY RELATED
TO POLICY AND PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION.
(3) THE TEAM SHALL:
(a) FOCUS ON ALIGNMENT OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM POLICIES
TO IMPROVE SERVICE DELIVERY AND OUTCOMES FOR COLORADANS, WITH AN
EMPHASIS ON INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES ACCESSING MULTIPLE PROGRAMS
AND SERVICES;
(b) ANALYZE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL POLICIES CONCERNING
PAGE 34-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS, INCLUDING
THE IMPACTS OF THOSE POLICIES ON OTHER PROGRAMS AND ON
ALLOCATIONS OF AVAILABLE FUNDING FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
(c) CREATE EVIDENCE-BASED ALIGNED AND STANDARDIZED POLICY
GUIDANCE FOR ADMINISTERING THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS THAT
ENABLES ADMINISTRATIVE UNIFORMITY AND CONSISTENCY TO THE EXTENT
ALLOWABLE UNDER FEDERAL LAW;
(d) ANNUALLY REVIEW THE INTERNAL POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
UTILIZED BY THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS, AS WELL AS PROGRESS
TOWARD ESTABLISHED GOALS AND OUTCOMES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED
TO:
(I) REDUCING ADMINISTRATIVE BURDEN;
(II) IMPROVING COST EFFICIENCY;
(III) DECREASING THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE BUT NOT ENROLLED
INDIVIDUALS;
(IV) EVALUATING BENEFIT AMOUNTS;
(V) ASSESSING PARTICIPANT DIRECT SERVICES; AND
(VI) MEASURING COUNTY AND PROGRAM PARTNER PERFORMANCE
OUTCOMES IN ORDER TO IDENTIFY AREAS FOR IMPROVEMENT;
(e) ANALYZE THE IMPACT OF AND OVERSEE THE ALIGNMENT OF
SIGNIFICANT POLICY OR PROGRAMMATIC CHANGES TO THE ADMINISTRATION
OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
(f) CREATE A PROCESS FOR THE STATE DEPARTMENTS TO
COORDINATE ALIGNED IMPLEMENTATION PROGRAM GUIDANCE AND
OVERSIGHT ACTIVITIES FOR COUNTIES, AS WELL AS COORDINATE BUDGET
REQUESTS ACROSS STATE DEPARTMENTS PRIOR TO SUBMISSION; AND
(g) SUBMIT QUARTERLY REPORTS TO RELEVANT STATE BOARDS AND
EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS OF STATE DEPARTMENTS THAT INCLUDE A SUMMARY
OF POLICY ITEMS DISCUSSED AND EVIDENCE-BASED DECISIONS MADE TO
PAGE 35-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

DATE.
(4) THE TEAM SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE
DEPARTMENTS CONCERNING ITS FINDINGS REGARDING THE ITEMS LISTED IN
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION DIMINISHES EXISTING RULE-MAKING
AUTHORITY OR ROLE OF BOARDS OR THE STATE DEPARTMENTS.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-307, amend
(1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(V) introductory portion as follows:
26-2-307. Fuel assistance payments - eligibility for federal
standard utility allowance - supplemental utility assistance fund
established - definitions - repeal.
(1) (b) (I) The state department shall make the fuel assistance
payments to eligible households that receive SNAP benefits but that do not
receive assistance under LEAP in order to qualify those households for the
standard utility allowance to maximize their SNAP benefits THAT HAVE NOT
RECEIVED LEAP ASSISTANCE IN THE PRECEDING TWELVE MONTHS AND THAT
ARE ELIGIBLE FOR THE STANDARD UTILITY ALLOWANCE PURSUANT 7 U.S.C.
SEC. 2014 (e)(6)(C)(iv).
(V) On or before April 1, 2024, and on or before April 1 of each
year, thereafter, the state department shall submit a budget to the
organization and the commission to include the state department's
administrative costs to implement the program, including the cost to issue
payments to ELIGIBLE recipients' electronic benefits transfer cards for
payments made pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, and the
projected number of eligible households, that the state department identifies
as receiving SNAP benefits but that are not receiving assistance under
LEAP, including an estimated number of new SNAP cases THAT ARE
ELIGIBLE FOR THE BENEFIT, that the state department will approve during the
upcoming federal fiscal year. Based on the budget that the state department
submits, the organization shall:
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25.5-1-115 as
follows:
PAGE 36-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

25.5-1-115. Locating violators - recoveries - repeal.
(1) The executive director of the state department, AND A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, or district attorneys may request
and shall MUST receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies
of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and the same are authorized
to provide, such THE assistance and data as will enable the state department,
and county departments, AND A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210 TO properly to carry out their powers and duties to locate and
prosecute any A person who has fraudulently obtained medical assistance
under this title. Any TITLE 25.5. Records established pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be ARE available only to the state
department, the department of human services, the county departments, A
COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, the attorney general,
and the district attorneys, county attorneys, and courts having jurisdiction
in fraud or recovery proceedings or actions.
(2) (a) All departments and agencies of the state and local
governments shall cooperate in the location and prosecution of any A person
who has fraudulently obtained medical assistance under this title TITLE 25.5,
and, on request of the county board, the county director, the state
department, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, shall
supply all information on hand relative to the location, employment,
income, and property of such THE persons, notwithstanding any other
provision of law making such information confidential, except the laws
pertaining to confidentiality of any tax returns filed pursuant to law with the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall furnish at no cost
to inquiring departments and agencies such information as may be necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this article ARTICLE 1. The procedures whereby
this information will be requested and provided shall USED TO REQUEST AND
PROVIDE THIS INFORMATION MUST be established by rule of the state
department. The state department or county departments shall use such THE
information only for the purposes of administering medical assistance under
this title TITLE 1, and the district attorney shall use it only for the
prosecution of persons who have fraudulently obtained medical assistance
under this title, and shall not use the information, or disclose it, for any
other purpose. THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL UTILIZE THE CENTRALIZED
PAGE 37-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210, TO CONDUCT FRAUD INVESTIGATIONS, FRAUD CLAIMS, FRAUD
RECOVERY, FRAUD DISPUTE RESOLUTION CONFERENCES, STATE-LEVEL
HEARINGS, INTENTIONAL PROGRAM VIOLATION WAIVERS, AND CRIMINAL
COURT PROCEEDINGS CONCERNING MEMBER ELIGIBILITY IN THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(b) (I) Whenever the state department, A COUNTY DEPARTMENT
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, or a district attorney for the
state department, or the state department on behalf of a county department,
recovers any amount of fraudulently obtained medical assistance funds, the
federal government shall be IS entitled to a share proportionate to the
amount of federal funds paid unless a different amount is otherwise
provided by federal law, the state shall be IS entitled to a share proportionate
to the amount of state funds paid and such additional amounts of federal
funds recovered as provided by federal law, and the county department shall
be IS entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid
unless a different amount is provided pursuant to federal law or this section.
(II) (A) Whenever a county department, a county board, a district
attorney, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, or a state
department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of
fraudulently obtained public assistance funds in the form of assistance
payments, it shall THE RECOVERED FUNDS MUST be deposited in the county
social services fund and the UNTIL THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED
TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210. WHEN THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO
UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE COUNTY
SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF THE FULL TRANSITION AND THE
COUNTY SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE COUNTY SOCIAL SERVICES
FUND TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
25.5-1-210. AFTER THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, AN ENTITY THAT RECOVERS, ON
BEHALF OF A COUNTY, AN AMOUNT OF FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE FUNDS SHALL TRANSFER THE RECOVERED FUNDS TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND. THE federal government is entitled to a
PAGE 38-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

share proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different
amount is provided for by federal law, the state is entitled to a share
proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid, and the county is
entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid and, in
addition, a share proportionate to one-half the amount of state funds paid.
(B) Whenever a county department, a county board, a district
attorney, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, or a state
department on behalf of a county department recovers any amount of
fraudulently obtained medical assistance, it shall THE RECOVERED FUNDS
MUST be deposited in the county social services fund and the UNTIL THE
COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210. WHEN THE COUNTY
HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
THE FULL TRANSITION AND THE COUNTY SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE
COUNTY SOCIAL SERVICES FUND TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL
CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. AFTER THE COUNTY HAS FULLY
TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE,
AN ENTITY THAT RECOVERS, ON BEHALF OF A COUNTY, AN AMOUNT OF
FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED MEDICAL ASSISTANCE FUNDS SHALL TRANSFER
THE RECOVERED FUNDS TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND. THE
federal government is entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of
federal funds paid, unless a different amount is provided for by federal law,
and the county is entitled to the remaining funds.
(C) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2028.
(III) (A) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, WHENEVER A COUNTY
DEPARTMENT, A COUNTY BOARD, A DISTRICT ATTORNEY, A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, OR A STATE DEPARTMENT ON
BEHALF OF A COUNTY DEPARTMENT RECOVERS ANY AMOUNT OF
FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FUNDS IN THE FORM OF
ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS, THE FRAUDULENT FUNDS SHALL BE TRANSFERRED
TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE
PAGE 39-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
25.5-1-210. THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IS ENTITLED TO A SHARE
PROPORTIONATE TO THE AMOUNT OF FEDERAL FUNDS PAID, UNLESS A
DIFFERENT AMOUNT IS PROVIDED FOR BY FEDERAL LAW, THE STATE IS
ENTITLED TO A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO ONE-HALF THE AMOUNT OF STATE
FUNDS PAID, AND THE COUNTY IS ENTITLED TO A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO
THE AMOUNT OF COUNTY FUNDS PAID AND, IN ADDITION, A SHARE
PROPORTIONATE TO ONE-HALF THE AMOUNT OF STATE FUNDS PAID.
(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, WHENEVER A COUNTY DEPARTMENT,
A COUNTY BOARD, A DISTRICT ATTORNEY, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, OR A STATE DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF OF A COUNTY
DEPARTMENT RECOVERS ANY AMOUNT OF FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE, AN AMOUNT FROM AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE VALUE OF
THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS THE INDIVIDUAL FRAUDULENTLY
OBTAINED SHALL BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL
CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IS
ENTITLED TO A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO THE AMOUNT OF FEDERAL FUNDS
PAID, UNLESS A DIFFERENT AMOUNT IS PROVIDED FOR BY FEDERAL LAW, AND
THE COUNTY IS ENTITLED TO THE REMAINING FUNDS.
(3) Whenever a county department, a county board, a district
attorney, or the state department on behalf of the county recovers any
amount of medical assistance payments that were obtained through
unintentional member error, the federal government is entitled to a share
proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid, unless a different amount
is provided for by federal law; the state is entitled to a share proportionate
to seventy-five percent of the amount of state funds paid; and the county is
entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of county funds paid, if any,
and, in addition, a share proportionate to twenty-five percent of the amount
of state funds paid.
(4) Actual costs and expenses incurred by the district attorney's
office in carrying out the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall
be billed to counties or a county within the judicial district in the
proportions specified in section 20-1-302, C.R.S. Each county shall make
an annual accounting to the state department on all amounts recovered.
PAGE 40-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(5) THE STATE PORTION OF THE MONEY RECOUPED BY THE STATE
DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE DEPOSITED INTO THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
25.5-1-210.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-118, amend (1);
and repeal (3) as follows:
25.5-1-118. Duties of county departments.
(1) The county departments or other state designated agencies,
where applicable, shall serve as agents of the state department and NO
LATER THAN JULY 1, 2028, shall be charged with the UTILIZE THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION
25.5-1-210, FOR THE administration of medical assistance and related
activities in the respective counties in accordance with the rules of the state
department.
(3) The county department or other state designated agencies, where
applicable, in each county shall submit quarterly and annually to the board
of county commissioners a budget containing an estimate and supporting
data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out the provisions
of this title.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-121, amend
(2); and add (4) as follows:
25.5-1-121. County expenditures - advancements - procedures.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article ARTICLE 1,
the county department may spend in excess of twenty percent of actual costs
for the purpose of matching federal funds for the administration of the child
support enforcement program or for the administrative costs of activities
involving food stamp OR public assistance. or medical assistance fraud
investigations or prosecutions.
(4) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DO NOT INCLUDE EXPENDITURES THAT
ARE DUPLICATIVE OF COSTS COVERED BY THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, OR SHARED
SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-1-802.
PAGE 41-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-1-139 as
follows:
25.5-1-139. State income tax refund offset - rules.
(1) (a) AT ANY TIME PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE,
BUT NOT LESS FREQUENTLY THAN ANNUALLY, THE STATE DEPARTMENT
SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE INFORMATION REGARDING
PERSONS WHO ARE OBLIGATED TO THE STATE FOR OVERPAYMENT OF
BENEFITS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO ARTICLES 4 TO 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5. THE
INFORMATION MUST INCLUDE CERTIFICATION OF THE AMOUNT OF
OVERPAYMENT THAT HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY FINAL AGENCY ACTION, HAS
BEEN ORDERED BY A COURT AS RESTITUTION, OR HAS BEEN REDUCED TO
JUDGMENT.
(b) THE INFORMATION REGARDING OVERPAYMENT OF BENEFITS MUST
ALSO INCLUDE THE NAME AND THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF THE
PERSON OBLIGATED TO THE STATE FOR THE OVERPAYMENT, THE AMOUNT OF
THE OVERPAYMENT, AND ANY OTHER IDENTIFYING INFORMATION REQUIRED
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(2) AS A CONDITION OF CERTIFYING AN OVERPAYMENT TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION,
THE STATE DEPARTMENT MUST ENSURE THAT THE OBLIGATED PERSON HAS
BEEN AFFORDED THE OPPORTUNITY FOR A CONFERENCE AT THE COUNTY
DEPARTMENT LEVEL AND AFFORDED THE OPPORTUNITY FOR AN APPEAL TO
THE STATE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-4-207. IN ADDITION,
THE STATE DEPARTMENT, PRIOR TO FINAL CERTIFICATION OF THE
INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MUST NOTIFY THE OBLIGATED PERSON, IN
WRITING, AT THE OBLIGATED PERSON'S LAST-KNOWN ADDRESS, THAT THE
STATE INTENDS TO REFER THE PERSON'S NAME TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE IN AN ATTEMPT TO OFFSET THE OBLIGATION AGAINST THE PERSON'S
STATE INCOME TAX REFUND. THE NOTIFICATION MUST INFORM THE
OBLIGATED PERSON OF THE OPPORTUNITY FOR A CONFERENCE WITH THE
COUNTY DEPARTMENT, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-4-207, OR THE
COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER A CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, AND OF THE OPPORTUNITY FOR
AN APPEAL TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-4-207.
IN ADDITION, THE NOTICE MUST SPECIFY ISSUES THAT MAY BE RAISED AT AN
PAGE 42-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

EVIDENTIARY CONFERENCE OR ON APPEAL, AS PROVIDED BY THIS
SUBSECTION (2), BY THE OBLIGATED PERSON IN OBJECTING TO THE OFFSET.
THE NOTICE MUST SPECIFY THAT THE OBLIGATED PERSON MAY NOT OBJECT
TO THE FACT THAT AN OVERPAYMENT OCCURRED. A PERSON WHO HAS
RECEIVED A NOTICE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) MAY REQUEST,
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE NOTICE WAS MAILED, AN
ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OR EVIDENTIARY CONFERENCE, AS PROVIDED IN
THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(3) UPON NOTIFICATION BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OF
AMOUNTS DEPOSITED TO THE STATE TREASURER PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-21-108, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE
AMOUNT DEPOSITED IS RELATED TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. IF THE AMOUNT IS NOT
RELATED TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL DISBURSE THE AMOUNTS TO THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY
FOR PROCESSING FOR DISTRIBUTION TO THE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
AGENCY TO WHICH THE PERSON IS OBLIGATED. IF THE AMOUNT IS RELATED
TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, SHALL DETERMINE THE
FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL AGENCY TO WHICH THE PERSON IS OBLIGATED,
AND THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE MONEY TO THE
FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL AGENCY TO WHICH THE PERSON IS OBLIGATED.
(4) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24 ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
(5) FOR A PROGRAM THAT IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, THE HOME
ADDRESSES AND SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS OF PERSONS SUBJECT TO THE
INCOME TAX REFUND OFFSET, PROVIDED TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MUST BE SENT TO THE RESPECTIVE COUNTY
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES. FOR A PROGRAM THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 25.5-1-210, THE HOME ADDRESSES AND SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS
OF PERSONS SUBJECT TO THE INCOME TAX REFUND OFFSET, PROVIDED TO THE
STATE DEPARTMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MUST BE SENT TO
THE COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
PAGE 43-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-204, add (4)
as follows:
25.5-4-204. Automated medical assistance administration.
(4) COUNTY-LEVEL FRAUD FUNCTIONS MUST BE ADMINISTERED
USING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN
SECTION 25.5-1-210, OR SHARED SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26-1-802.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-112, amend
(2)(b)(II); and add (2)(b)(III) as follows:
26-1-112. Locating violators - recoveries - repeal.
(2) (b) (II) (A) Whenever a county department, a county board, A
COUNTY DEPARTMENT CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, a district
attorney, or a state department on behalf of a county department recovers
any amount of fraudulently obtained public assistance funds in the form of
assistance payments, it shall be deposited in the county general fund and the
UNTIL THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210. WHEN THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING OF THE FULL
TRANSITION AND THE COUNTY SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE COUNTY
SOCIAL SERVICES FUND TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. AFTER THE COUNTY HAS FULLY
TRANSITIONED TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE,
AN ENTITY THAT RECOVERS, ON BEHALF OF A COUNTY, AN AMOUNT OF
FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FUNDS SHALL TRANSFER THE
RECOVERED FUNDS TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND. THE
federal government shall be IS entitled to a share proportionate to the
amount of federal funds paid unless a different amount is provided for by
federal law, the state shall be IS entitled to a share proportionate to one-half
PAGE 44-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

the amount of state funds paid, and the county shall be CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210 IS entitled to a share proportionate to the amount of
county funds paid and, in addition, a share proportionate to one-half the
amount of state funds paid. In the case of funds recovered from fraudulently
obtained food stamp coupons by the A county department, A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, the county board, the district
attorney, or the state department, on behalf of a county department, OR the
county shall be IS entitled to the share of the recovered funds provided by
the federal "Food Stamp Act" UNTIL THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED
TO UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210. WHEN THE COUNTY HAS FULLY TRANSITIONED TO
UTILIZING THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, THE COUNTY
MUST NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING OF
THE FULL TRANSITION AND THE COUNTY SHALL TRANSFER THE FUNDS TO THE
STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b)(II) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2028.
(III) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, WHENEVER A COUNTY DEPARTMENT,
A COUNTY BOARD, A COUNTY DEPARTMENT CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER
THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210, A DISTRICT ATTORNEY, OR A STATE DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF OF
A COUNTY DEPARTMENT RECOVERS ANY AMOUNT OF FRAUDULENTLY
OBTAINED PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FUNDS IN THE FORM OF ASSISTANCE
PAYMENTS, THE FUNDS SHALL BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE TREASURER,
WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT IS ENTITLED TO A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO THE AMOUNT OF
FEDERAL FUNDS PAID UNLESS A DIFFERENT AMOUNT IS PROVIDED FOR BY
FEDERAL LAW, THE STATE IS ENTITLED TO A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO
ONE-HALF THE AMOUNT OF STATE FUNDS PAID, AND THE COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210 IS ENTITLED TO A SHARE
PROPORTIONATE TO THE AMOUNT OF COUNTY FUNDS PAID AND, IN ADDITION,
A SHARE PROPORTIONATE TO ONE-HALF THE AMOUNT OF STATE FUNDS PAID.
IN THE CASE OF FUNDS RECOVERED FROM FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED FOOD
PAGE 45-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

STAMP COUPONS BY THE COUNTY DEPARTMENT OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED
TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, THE ENTITY THAT RECOVERED THE FUNDS SHALL
TRANSFER THE FUNDS TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-118, amend
(1)(a), (6) introductory portion, and (7) as follows:
26-1-118. Duties of county departments, county directors, and
district attorneys.
(1) (a) The county departments or other state designated agencies,
where applicable, shall serve as agents of the state department and are
charged with the administration of public assistance, and welfare and
related activities in the respective counties in accordance with the rules of
the state department. ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE COUNTY
DEPARTMENTS SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, AND SHARED SERVICES, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 26-1-802, TO ENSURE EFFICIENT AND CONSISTENT
ADMINISTRATION OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS AND RELATED
ACTIVITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE.
(6) The county department, OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, shall report, to the district attorney monthly, data
relating to fraudulent activities covering, as a minimum, the activities
specified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (d) of this subsection (6), SUBSECTIONS
(6)(a), (6)(b), AND (6)(d) OF THIS SECTION, and the district attorney shall
likewise report, monthly, to the county department, OR TO A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, the data specified in paragraph
(c) of this subsection (6) SUBSECTION (6)(c) OF THIS SECTION, as follows
when applicable:
(7) The counties may prepare and issue to all payees, excluding
heads of households in nonpublic assistance food stamp cases, at the time
of delivery of any public assistance, a hermetically sealed photo
identification card which THAT is manufactured in such a secure manner as
PAGE 46-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

to resist duplication or intrusion and containing the full name, a card
identification number, and any other data which THAT would ensure proper
identification. A county department, OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, shall refer to the appropriate law enforcement agency
for investigation, within ten working days after discovery, any information
it may have concerning the improper use of a photo identification card by
a person not eligible to possess such THE card.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-122, amend
(3)(c), (4)(i), and (6)(c) as follows:
26-1-122. County appropriations and expenditures -
advancements - procedures.
(3) (c) For purposes of this article ARTICLE 1, and except as
otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, under rules of the state
department, administrative costs shall include: Salaries of the county
director and employees of the county department staff engaged in the
performance of assistance payments, food stamps, and social services
activities; the county's payments on behalf of such employees for old age
and survivors' insurance or pursuant to a county officers' and employees'
retirement plan and for any health insurance plan, if approved by the state
department; the necessary travel expenses of the county board and the
administrative staff of the county department in the performance of their
duties; necessary telephone and telegraph COSTS; necessary equipment and
supplies; necessary payments for postage and printing, including the
printing and preparation of county warrants required for the administration
of the county department; and such other administrative costs as may be
approved by the state department; but advancements for office space,
utilities, and fixtures may be made from state funds only if federal matching
funds are available. ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DO NOT INCLUDE
EXPENDITURES THAT ARE DUPLICATIVE OF COSTS COVERED BY THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION
25.5-1-210, AND SHARED SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-1-802.
(4) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article ARTICLE
1, the county department may receive and spend federal funds to which it
is entitled by reason of the county's expenditures in excess of the twenty
percent required by subsection (1) of this section for any A social services
PAGE 47-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

activity that has been approved by the STATE department as an activity that
is eligible for reimbursement under any federal program. Acceptance and
expenditure of such federal funds shall in no way affect AFFECTS the state's
share of and contribution to such THE payments, and the county shall be IS
solely responsible for the provision of the nonfederal share that is in excess
of the twenty percent. EXPENDITURES THAT ARE DUPLICATIVE OF COSTS
COVERED BY THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED
IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, AND SHARED SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
26-1-802, ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR FEDERAL OR STATE REIMBURSEMENT.
(6) (c) The state department shall establish rules concerning what
constitutes administrative costs and program costs for the Colorado works
program. The executive director of the department of early childhood, in
coordination with county departments, shall establish rules concerning what
constitutes administrative costs and program costs for the Colorado child
care assistance program. The state treasurer shall make advancements to
county departments for the costs of administering the Colorado works
program and the Colorado child care assistance program from funds
appropriated or made available for such THAT purpose, upon authorization
of the department of early childhood or the state department, as applicable;
except that in no event shall the department of early childhood or the state
department SHALL NOT authorize expenditures greater than the annual
appropriation by the general assembly for such THE administrative costs of
the county departments. As funds are advanced, adjustment shall MUST be
made from subsequent monthly payments for those purposes.
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DO NOT INCLUDE EXPENDITURES THAT ARE
DUPLICATIVE OF COSTS COVERED BY THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, AND SHARED SERVICES, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 26-1-802, AND ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR FEDERAL OR
STATE REIMBURSEMENT.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-107, amend
(1)(c) and (2) as follows:
26-2-107. Verification - record.
(1) (c) Within ten working days after a discrepancy relating to a
fraudulent or suspected fraudulent act affecting eligibility is discovered, it
THE DISCREPANCY shall be referred to the appropriate investigatory agency
for investigation. The investigatory agency shall take action within thirty
PAGE 48-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

days following AFTER receipt of the information from the county department
OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210.
(2) The county department, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER
THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210, the state department, and the officers and authorized employees
of each ENTITY may conduct visits to the home of the applicant at
reasonable times, make investigations and require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers by
subpoena, and make application to the district court to compel and enforce
such attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of such
books, records, and papers. Officers and employees designated by the
county department, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210, or the state department may administer oaths and affirmations.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-133, amend (3)
and (5) as follows:
26-2-133. State income tax refund offset - rules.
(3) Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts
deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 39-21-108, C.R.S., THE
STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE AMOUNT DEPOSITED
IS RELATED TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE,
ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210. IF THE AMOUNT IS NOT RELATED TO
THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, the state department shall
disburse such amounts THE AMOUNT to the appropriate county for
processing for distribution to the federal, state, or local agency to whom
WHICH the person is obligated. IF THE AMOUNT IS RELATED TO THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210 SHALL DETERMINE THE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
AGENCY TO WHICH THE PERSON IS OBLIGATED AND INFORM THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING OF THE AGENCY, AND
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING SHALL
DISTRIBUTE THE MONEY TO THE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL AGENCY TO
WHICH THE PERSON IS OBLIGATED.
PAGE 49-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(5) FOR A PROGRAM THAT IS NOT THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, the home
addresses and social security numbers of persons subject to the income tax
refund offset, provided to the state department by the department of
revenue, must be sent to the respective county department. of human or
social services. FOR A PROGRAM THAT IS THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, THE HOME
ADDRESSES AND SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS OF PERSONS SUBJECT TO THE
INCOME TAX REFUND OFFSET, PROVIDED TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MUST BE SENT TO THE COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-103, amend
(3) as follows:
26.5-4-103. Definitions.
As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "County department" means the county or district department of
human or social services, OR, FOR FUNCTIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
ADMINISTERED PURSUANT TO THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE, ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-106, amend
(2)(d) and (2)(e) as follows:
26.5-4-106. Applications for child care assistance - applications
for child care employees - verification - award - not assignable -
limitation - rules.
(2) (d) Within ten working days after the county department
discovers a discrepancy relating to a fraudulent or suspected fraudulent act
affecting eligibility, the county department shall refer the matter to the
appropriate investigatory agency, INCLUDING A COUNTY OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210 for investigation. The
PAGE 50-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

investigatory agency, WHICH MAY BE A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, shall take action within thirty days following AFTER
receipt of the information from the county department.
(e) The county department, the department, A COUNTY CONTRACTED
TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, and the officers and authorized employees of each
ENTITY may conduct visits to the home of the applicant at reasonable times,
make investigations and require the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of books, records, and papers by subpoena, and make
application to the district court to compel and enforce such attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of such books, records, and
papers. Officers and employees designated by the county department or the
department OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210 may
administer oaths and affirmations.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 26.5-4-116 as
follows:
26.5-4-116. Recovery from recipient - estate.
(1) (a) If, at any time during the continuance of child care assistance,
the recipient becomes possessed of property having a value in excess of that
amount set pursuant to the provisions of section 26.5-4-106 (4) and
department rules or receives any AN increase in income, the recipient shall
notify the county department of the possession of the property or receipt of
the income, and the county department may either terminate the child care
assistance or alter the amount of child care assistance in accordance with
the circumstances and department rules.
(b) To the extent not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, if
the recipient is found to have committed an intentional program violation,
the recipient is disqualified from participation in CCCAP for twelve months
for the first incident, twenty-four months for a second incident, and
permanently for a third or subsequent incident. This disqualification is
mandatory and is in addition to any other penalty imposed by law.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any
PAGE 51-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

previously provided excess child care assistance to which the recipient was
not entitled is recoverable by the county, as a debt due OR BY A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, AS A DEBT OWED. IF THE DEBT
OWED IS DUE TO FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE OR
FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED OVERPAYMENTS OF CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE, THE
RECOVERY OF THE DEBT MUST BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-210
AND THE COUNTY IN A PROPORTION DETERMINED BY DEPARTMENT RULE. IF
THE DEBT OWED IS DUE TO EXCESS CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PAID FOR WHICH
THE RECIPIENT WAS INELIGIBLE BUT THAT WAS NOT FRAUDULENTLY
OBTAINED, THE RECOVERY OF THAT DEBT MUST BE DISTRIBUTED to the state
and the county in proportion to the amount of child care assistance paid by
each respectively. except that ON AN AMOUNT OF CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE
FRAUDULENTLY OBTAINED, interest is MUST BE charged and paid to the
county department, on any sum fraudulently obtained, OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, calculated at the legal rate and
calculated from the date the sum was paid to a provider on behalf of the
recipient to the date the sum is recovered.
(d) If the debt for fraudulently obtained child care assistance,
fraudulently obtained overpayments of child care assistance, or excess child
care assistance paid for which the recipient was ineligible has been reduced
to a judgment in a court of record in this state, the county department, OR A
COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER
INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, may seek a
continuing garnishment to collect the debt under PURSUANT TO article 54.5
of title 13.
(2) If, upon the death or mental incompetency of any A recipient, the
inventory of the recipient's estate shows assets in excess of the amount that
the recipient was allowed to have in order to receive child care assistance,
or if it be IS shown that the recipient was otherwise ineligible for child care
assistance, then the claim of the county, OR OF A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, and state for the excess child care assistance paid for
which the recipient was ineligible, if filed as required by section 15-12-804,
has priority as a debt given preference under PURSUANT TO section
15-12-805 (1)(f.7).
PAGE 52-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(3) When a recipient was ineligible for child care assistance solely
because of property in excess of that permitted by department rules pursuant
to section 26.5-4-106 (4), the amount for which the recipient is liable is the
amount by which the property exceeded the amount allowable under said
THE rules or the total amount of child care assistance received, whichever
is the lesser amount. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
actions for the recovery of these sums must be prosecuted by the county
department, A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, or the
department in a court of record that has jurisdiction.
(4) The department and a county department, OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, may elect not to attempt
recovery of an overpayment of child care assistance from an individual who
is no longer receiving public assistance or child care assistance if the
overpayment amount is less than thirty-five dollars. If the overpayment
amount owed by an individual who is no longer receiving public assistance
or child care assistance is thirty-five dollars or more, the department and the
county department, OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE
CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-210, may determine, consistent with the six-year time limitation for
the execution on judgments involving state debt, that it is no longer
cost-effective to continue to pursue recovery of the overpayment.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 26.5-4-117 as
follows:
26.5-4-117. Locating violators - recoveries.
(1) The executive director or district attorneys may request and
receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the state or
any of its political subdivisions, and the same THE DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS,
BUREAUS, OR OTHER AGENCIES OF THE STATE OR ANY OF ITS POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS are required to provide such assistance and data as will enable
the department and county departments, properly to OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, TO PROPERLY carry out their
powers and duties to locate and prosecute any A person who fraudulently
obtains child care assistance pursuant to this part 1. Any Records
PAGE 53-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

established pursuant to the provisions of this section are available only to
the department, the county departments OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO
ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-210, the attorney general, and the district attorneys, county
attorneys, and courts having jurisdiction in fraud or recovery proceedings
or actions.
(2) All departments and agencies of the state and local governments
shall cooperate in the location and prosecution of a person who fraudulently
obtains child care assistance pursuant to this part 1, and, on request of the
county or district board of human or social services, the county director, the
department, or the district attorney of any A judicial district in this state
shall supply all information on hand relative to the location, employment,
income, and property of said persons THE PERSON, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the information confidential, except the laws
pertaining to confidentiality of tax returns filed pursuant to law with the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall furnish at no cost
to inquiring departments and agencies such information as may be necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this part 1. The executive director shall, by
rule, establish the procedures whereby this information is requested and
provided. The department or county departments, OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, shall use such THE information
only for the purposes of administering the Colorado child care assistance
program pursuant to this part 1, and a district attorney shall use it only for
the prosecution of persons who fraudulently obtain child care assistance
pursuant to this part 1, and shall not use the information, or disclose it, for
any other purpose.
(3) A district attorney shall bill the actual costs and expenses
incurred by the district attorney's office in carrying out the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section to counties or a county within the judicial
district, OR A COUNTY CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED
MEMBER INTEGRITY SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, in the
proportions specified in section 20-1-302. Each county, OR A COUNTY
CONTRACTED TO ADMINISTER THE CENTRALIZED MEMBER INTEGRITY
SERVICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-210, shall make an annual
accounting to the department on all amounts recovered.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-108, amend
PAGE 54-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(3)(a)(VII) as follows:
39-21-108. Refunds.
(3) (a) (VII) (A) Any moneys MONEY withheld for payment of
obligations owed the department of human services for overpayment of
public assistance benefits pursuant to this subsection (3) shall MUST be
deposited with the state treasurer for disbursement by the department of
human services. For all names and associated amounts certified by the
department of human services pursuant to section 26-2-133, C.R.S., the
executive director of the department of revenue shall provide to the
department of human services the names of taxpayers and the associated
amounts deposited with the state treasurer and any other identifying
information as required by the department of human services.
(B) MONEY WITHHELD FOR PAYMENT OF OBLIGATIONS OWED THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING FOR OVERPAYMENT
OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS PAID PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)
MUST BE DEPOSITED WITH THE STATE TREASURER FOR DISBURSEMENT BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING. FOR ALL NAMES
AND ASSOCIATED AMOUNTS CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
CARE POLICY AND FINANCING PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-139, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING THE NAMES OF
TAXPAYERS AND THE ASSOCIATED AMOUNTS DEPOSITED WITH THE STATE
TREASURER AND ANY OTHER IDENTIFYING INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING.
SECTION 23. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $2,438,656 is appropriated to the department of health care policy and
financing for use by the executive director's office. This appropriation
consists of $1,628,568 from the general fund and $810,088 from the
healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital provider fee cash fund
created in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
office may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $447,737, which consists of $297,166 from general fund and
$150,571 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for personal services, which amount is based on an
assumption that the office will require an additional 8.5 FTE;
PAGE 55-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(b) $35,173, which consists of $23,527 from general fund and
$11,646 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for operating expenses;
(c) $907,419, which consists of $606,718 from general fund and
$300,701 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for general professional services and special
projects;
(d) $868,590, which consists of $580,997 from general fund and
$287,593 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for member case integrity centralized service related
to eligibility determinations and client services;
(e) $60,649, which consists of $40,502 from general fund and
$20,147 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for the purchase of information technology services;
and
(f) $119,088, which consists of $79,658 from general fund and
$39,430 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund, for the purchase of legal services.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of health care policy and financing will
receive $3,051,099 in federal funds for use by the executive director's office
to implement this act, which amount is subject to the "(I)" notation as
defined in the annual general appropriation act for the same fiscal year. The
appropriation in subsection (1) of this section is based on the assumption
that the office will receive this amount of federal funds to be used as
follows:
(a) $460,423 for personal services;
(b) $35,613 for operating expenses;
(c) $1,375,231 for general professional services and special projects;
(d) $879,420 for member case integrity centralized service related
to eligibility determinations and client services;
PAGE 56-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(e) $179,840 for the purchase of information technology services;
and
(f) $120,572 for the purchase of legal services.
(3) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $212,593 is appropriated to the
department of health care policy and financing. This appropriation consists
of $141,280 from the general fund, which is subject to the "(M)" notation
as defined in the annual general appropriation act for the same fiscal year,
and $71,313 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability hospital
provider fee cash fund created in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S. To
implement this act, the department may use this appropriation for Colorado
benefits management systems, operating and contract expenses.
(4) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of health care policy and financing will
receive $1,805,948 in federal funds for Colorado benefits management
systems, operating and contract expenses to implement this act. The
appropriation in subsection (3) of this section is based on the assumption
that the department will receive this amount of federal funds.
(5) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $240,489 is appropriated to the
office of the governor for use by the office of information technology. This
appropriation is from reappropriated funds received from the department of
health care policy and financing under subsections (1)(e) and (2)(e) of this
section. To implement this act, the office may use this appropriation to
provide information technology services for the department of health care
policy and financing.
(6) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $239,660 is appropriated to the
department of law. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds received
from the department of health care policy and financing under subsection
(1)(f) and 2(f) of this section and is based on an assumption that the
department of law will require an additional 1.3 FTE. To implement this
act, the department of law may use this appropriation to provide legal
services for the department of health care policy and financing.
SECTION 24. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $968,791 is appropriated to the department of human services for use
by the office of economic security. This appropriation is from the general
PAGE 57-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

fund. To implement this act, the office may use this appropriation as
follows:
Administration
Administration $401,997
Colorado benefits management system; ongoing expenses
Operating and contract expenses $146,694
Food and energy assistance
Electronic benefits transfer services $59,850
County administration
Member case integrity centralized service $360,250
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $320,291 is appropriated to the
department of human services for use by the office of economic security.
This appropriation is from the healthy school meals for all program fund
created in section 22-82.9-211 (2)(a), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
office may use this appropriation as follows:
Administration
Administration $143,287
Colorado benefits management system; ongoing expenses
Operating and contract expenses $36,092
Food and energy assistance
Electronic benefits transfer services $18,450
County administration
Member case integrity centralized service $122,462
PAGE 58-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(3) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of human services will receive $139,003 for
use by the office of economic security. This appropriation is from the old
age pension fund created in section 1 of article XXIV of the state
constitution, which is subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual
general appropriation act for the same fiscal year. To implement this act, the
office may use this appropriation as follows:
Administration
Administration $36,833
Colorado benefits management system; ongoing expenses
Operating and contract expenses $9,278
Food and energy assistance
Electronic benefits transfer services $23,250
County administration
Member case integrity centralized service $69,642
(4) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $189,149 is appropriated to the
department of human services for the office of economic security. This
appropriation is from federal temporary assistance for needy families block
grant funds. To implement this act, the office may use this appropriation as
follows:
Administration
Administration $37,680
Colorado benefits management system; ongoing expenses
Operating and contract expenses $75,531
Food and energy assistance
PAGE 59-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

Electronic benefits transfer services $17,550
County administration
Member case integrity centralized service $58,388
(5) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of human services will receive $554,880 in
federal funds for use by the office of economic security to implement this
act, which amount is subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual
general appropriation act for the same fiscal year. The appropriations in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section are based on the assumption that the
department will receive this amount of federal funds to be used as follows:
Administration
Administration $238,810
Colorado benefits management system; ongoing expenses
Operating and contract expenses $80,758
Food and energy assistance
Electronic benefits transfer services $30,900
County administration
Member case integrity centralized service $204,412
(6) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $2,022,114 is appropriated to
the department of health care policy and financing for use by the executive
director's office. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds received
from the department of human services under subsections (1), (2), (3), (4),
and (5) of this section. To implement this act, the office may use this
appropriation as follows:
General administration
Personal services $198,952
PAGE 60-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

Operating expenses $18,008
Legal services $60,966
Payments to OIT $61,180
General professional services
and special projects $580,681
Information technology contracts and projects
Colorado benefits management systems,
operating and contract expenses $348,353
Eligibility determinations and client services
Member case integrity centralized service $753,974
(7) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $61,180 is appropriated to the
office of the governor for use by the office of information technology. This
appropriation is from reappropriated funds received from the department of
health care policy and financing under subsection (6) of this section for
payments to OIT. To implement this act, the office may use this
appropriation to provide information technology services for the department
of health care policy and financing.
(8) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $60,966 is appropriated to the
department of law. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds received
from the department of health care policy and financing under subsection
(6) of this section for legal services. To implement this act, the department
of law may use this appropriation to provide legal services for the
department of health care policy and financing.
SECTION 25. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $445,196 is appropriated to the department of early childhood. This
appropriation consists of $222,598 from the general fund and $222,598
from federal child care development funds. To implement this act, the
department may use this appropriation as follows:
PAGE 61-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

(a) $59,283, which consists of $29,641 from general fund and
$29,642 from federal child care development funds, for information
technology systems managed by other departments; and
(b) $385,913, which consists of $192,957 from general fund and
$192,956 from federal child care development funds, for use by early
learning access and quality for county shared services.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $432,913 is appropriated to the
department of health care policy and financing for use by the executive
director's office. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds received
from the department of early childhood under subsection (1) of this section.
To implement this act, the office may use this appropriation as follows:
General administration
Personal services $61,273
Operating expenses $4,936
Legal services $16,712
Payments to OIT $16,770
General professional services
and special projects $159,174
Information technology contracts and projects
Colorado benefits management systems,
operating and contract expenses $59,283
Eligibility determinations and client services
Member case integrity centralized service $121,892
(3) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $16,770 is appropriated to the
office of the governor for use by the office of information technology. This
PAGE 62-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

appropriation is from reappropriated funds received from the department of
health care policy and financing under subsection (2) of this section for
payments to OIT. To implement this act, the office may use this
appropriation to provide information technology services for the department
of health care policy and financing.
(4) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $16,712 is appropriated to the
department of law. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds received
from the department of health care policy and financing under subsection
(6) of this section for legal services. To implement this act, the department
of law may use this appropriation to provide legal services for the
department of health care policy and financing.
SECTION 26. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the appropriation from federal child care development funds made in
the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of early childhood for intrastate child care assistance program
redistribution is decreased by $222,598.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the federal child care development funds
appropriation made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year to the department of early childhood for intrastate child care
assistance program redistribution is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of early childhood
for intrastate child care assistance program redistribution.
SECTION 27. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 26 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 26 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the
annual general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is
later.
PAGE 63-HOUSE BILL 26-1429

SECTION 28. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 64-HOUSE BILL 26-1429